Utah statutes.
76-10-1103.   Gambling fraud.

(1) A person is guilty of gambling fraud if he participates in gambling and wins or acquires to himself or another any gambling proceeds when he knows he has a lesser risk of losing or greater chance of winning than one or more of the other participants, and the risk is not known to all participants.

(2)  A person convicted of gambling fraud shall be punished as in the case of theft of property of like value.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

